Missouri, session 2026, SB1018.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 571.014, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
571.014 and 571.515, to read as follows:
571.014. 1. A person commits the crime of unlawful
refusal to transfer by denying sale of a firearm to a
nonlicensee, who is otherwise not prohibited from possessing
a firearm under state or federal law, solely on the basis
that the nonlicensee purchased a firearm that was later the
subject of a trace request by law enforcement.
2. Violation of subsection 1 of this section shall be
a class A misdemeanor.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, other than the provisions of section 571.515, no
federal firearms dealer licensed under 18 U.S.C. Section 923
who engages in the sale of firearms within this state shall
fail or refuse to complete the sale of a firearm to a
customer in every case in which the sale is authorized by
federal law.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
any individual federal firearms license holder, his agents,

SB 1018 2
or employees to the extent they chose in their individual
judgment to not complete the sale or transfer of a firearm
for articulable reasons specific to that transaction, so
long as those reasons are not based on the race, gender,
religion, creed of the buyer.
571.515. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Contact person", the person designated as a
contact pursuant to subsection 3 of this section by the
person voluntarily waiving the right to purchase a firearm;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of public
safety;
(3) "Voluntary waiver", a voluntary waiver of the
right to purchase a firearm as described in this section.
2. (1) A person may voluntarily waive the right to
purchase a firearm. While such waiver is in effect, no
person shall sell or otherwise transfer a firearm to a
person who voluntarily waived the right to purchase a
firearm.
(2) The department shall promulgate forms for a person
to file either in person or electronically for a voluntary
waiver, to update contact information, and to revoke a
voluntary waiver.
3. (1) To voluntarily waive the right to purchase a
firearm, a person shall file a voluntary waiver with the
department. The department shall verify the person's
identity prior to accepting the voluntary waiver.
(2) A person who voluntarily waives the right to
purchase a firearm may designate one or more contact persons
who will be contacted, pursuant to this section, if the
person attempts to purchase a firearm while the voluntary

SB 1018 3
waiver is in effect or if the person revokes the voluntary
waiver.
(3) The department shall immediately notify the person
who filed the voluntary waiver and each contact person when
the department accepts the filer's voluntary waiver.
(4) No later than twenty-four hours after accepting a
voluntary waiver, the department shall enter the voluntary
waiver into the national instant criminal background check
system and any other federal or state computer-based systems
used by law enforcement agencies or others to identify
prohibited purchasers of firearms.
(5) All forms or records filed pursuant to this
section shall be confidential and shall be closed records
under chapter 610.
4. Within twenty-four hours of an attempted transfer
of a firearm to a person with a voluntary waiver, the
department shall notify each contact person for such person.
5. (1) To revoke a voluntary waiver, a person shall
file for revocation with the department. The department
shall verify the person's identity prior to accepting the
revocation. The waiver shall remain in effect for thirty
days after the department accepts the revocation.
(2) The department shall notify each contact person of
the revocation no later than twenty-four hours after the
department receives the revocation request.
(3) Thirty days after the department accepts the
revocation, and unless the person is otherwise ineligible to
possess a firearm pursuant to state or federal law, the
department shall remove the person's information from the
national instant criminal background check system and any
other federal or state computer-based systems in which the
person was entered and that are used by law enforcement

SB 1018 4
agencies or others to identify prohibited purchasers of
firearms, and the department shall destroy all records of
the voluntary waiver.
6. The submission of a voluntary waiver shall be made
only by the person to whom the voluntary waiver shall
apply. Any person that attempts to submit a voluntary
waiver on behalf of another person shall be guilty of a
class A misdemeanor.
7. The department may promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓